Vermont, session 2025-2026, S322.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds that artificial legal persons, including
corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, cooperative
associations, mutual benefit enterprises, unincorporated nonprofit associations,
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 2 of 36
and statutory or business trusts, are created under the laws of this State and
possess only those powers that the State expressly grants.
(b) Under Chapter II, §§ 6 and 69 of the Vermont Constitution, no charter
of incorporation shall be granted, extended, changed, or amended without
reserving to the General Assembly the right of revocation or alteration. The
General Assembly, subject to the provisions of § 69 of the Constitution, retains
full authority to revise, limit, or withdraw the statutory powers and charter
privileges conferred upon artificial legal persons whenever the public good so
requires.
(c) Broad statutory clauses in Vermont’s entity laws, including
authorizations to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out an entity’s
purposes, have been construed to include powers to engage in election activity
and ballot-issue activity. The General Assembly finds that such political
spending authority was never intended to be among the powers granted to
artificial legal persons under Vermont law.
(d) The purposes of this act are to:
(1) revoke any prior broad grants of powers to artificial legal persons
that may be construed to authorize election activity or ballot-issue activity;
(2) regrant only those powers necessary or convenient for lawful
business, charitable, cooperative, or organizational purposes, expressly
excluding any authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity;
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 3 of 36
(3) establish uniform limitations across all entity forms while preserving
distinctions among them; and
(4) preserve and protect the constitutional rights of natural persons and
the lawful activities of political committees and political parties.
Sec. 2. 11 V.S.A. § 42 is amended to read:
§ 42. SPECIFIC PURPOSES
Subject to the provisions of this title, one or more persons may form a
private corporation for the specific purposes and in the manner following:
(1) To operate a regional clearinghouse and a cooperative loan plan,
commonly called a central fund, or either, for those banks in the State which
that become stockholders or members of the corporation. Such corporations
may be organized only with the consent of the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation, with or without capital stock.
(A) In addition to the powers conferred by this chapter, they as
limited by this section, private corporations shall have the following powers:
(i) all the powers necessary or convenient for carrying out the
purposes herein set forth, including the power to receive deposits of funds from
a member bank and to administer the same, and to require such deposits from
all member banks in uniform percentages, but not in excess of three percent, of
the total deposits of any one bank;
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 4 of 36
(ii) to assist member banks when they are temporarily in need of
cash or hold investments which that cannot readily be liquidated;
(iii) to borrow money and to pledge its assets as security therefor;
(iv) to issue scrip to the extent and with such security and under
such regulations as the Commissioner of Financial Regulation, with the
consent of the Governor, may approve;
(v) to make loans to member banks and to guarantee the
performance of any obligation of a member bank; and
(vi) to establish reserves, and to take over from member banks
property, securities, or investments for the purpose of managing, liquidating,
exchanging, or adjusting the same.
* * *
(2) To operate a corporation for the rehabilitation of individuals and
families by enabling them to secure subsistence and gainful employment from
the soil, from coordinate and affiliated industries and enterprises and
otherwise, and to receive and administer money for that purpose which may
become available from any source. Such corporations shall have all the
powers of corporations organized under this chapter and in addition thereto
may loan money and secure the payment thereof by mortgage, pledge, or lien,
insure or guarantee any indebtedness incurred by others, and become secured
for so doing by mortgage, pledge, or lien. Such corporations shall not be
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 5 of 36
organized for profit, and shall not be subject to taxation, nor shall any stock or
indebtedness of such corporations or any evidence thereof be taxable to any
holder thereof under any provision of law. The capital stock of such
corporations may be with or without par value and the amount thereof,
notwithstanding the provisions of this title, may be less than $500.00 and in
case the stock has no par value then the number of shares of such stock may be
less than ten 10, representing less than $500.00. The Governor may designate
any such corporation as his or her the Governor’s agent or an agency of the
State to carry on rehabilitation activities within the State. Such corporations
shall not be subject to the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapters 1, 3, 21, and 29 and
8 V.S.A. part Part 3 and 9 V.S.A. chapter 131, or to the provisions of section
131 of this title.
(3) A corporation organized pursuant to this chapter possesses no power
to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and any such activity is
ultra vires and void.
(4) As used in this section:
(A)(i) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative,
referendum, recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other
question formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its
political subdivisions.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 6 of 36
(ii) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(I) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial
distributed through an independent news organization not owned or controlled
by a political party, political committee, or candidate;
(II) the determination by a corporation to endorse a ballot
question and the de minimis use of resources of the corporation to
communicate the endorsement to the general public; or
(III) activity by a corporation to support or oppose
consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body
of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
(B)(i) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(ii) “Election activity” does not include:
(I) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial
distributed through an independent news organization not owned or controlled
by a political party, political committee, or candidate;
(II) the determination by a corporation to endorse a candidate
and the de minimis use of corporation resources to communicate the
endorsement of the candidate to the general public, provided that the
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 7 of 36
endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate or the
candidate’s committee; or
(III) the de minimis use of corporation resources to provide
administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
(5) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules
regarding the definitions of terms set forth in subdivision (4) of this section,
including setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
Sec. 3. 11 V.S.A. § 108 is amended to read:
§ 108. BANKS, TRUST AND MUTUAL INSURANCE COMPANIES
(a) A corporation organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 202
or 203, to conduct the business of a financial institution, and a mutual
insurance company organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 101,
may make such contributions for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or
educational purposes as are authorized by its directors or trustees to an amount
not to exceed five percent of its net income for the previous calendar year
computed in the manner specified by the Internal Revenue Code in effect
during the year applicable for corporations. Contributions in excess of the five
percent of the net income may be made by a vote of its stockholders,
depositors, or members.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 8 of 36
(b) A corporation organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 202
or 203, to conduct the business of a financial institution, and a mutual
insurance company organized under the provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 101,
possesses no power to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and
any such activity is ultra vires and void.
(c) As used in this section:
(1)(i) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(ii) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(I) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial
distributed through an independent news organization not owned or controlled
by a political party, political committee, or candidate;
(II) the determination by a corporation to endorse a ballot
question and the de minimis use of resources of the corporation to
communicate the endorsement to the general public; or
(III) activity by a corporation to support or oppose
consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 9 of 36
of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
(2)(i) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(ii) “Election activity” does not include:
(I) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial
distributed through an independent news organization not owned or controlled
by a political party, political committee, or candidate;
(II) the determination by a corporation to endorse a candidate
and the de minimis use of corporation resources to communicate the
endorsement of the candidate to the general public, provided that the
endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate or the
candidate’s committee; or
(III) the de minimis use of corporation resources to provide
administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
(d) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (c) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 10 of 36
Sec. 4. 11 V.S.A. § 994 is amended to read:
§ 994. POWERS
(a) Each association incorporated under this subchapter shall have the
following powers:
* * *
(10) To do everything necessary, suitable, or proper for the
accomplishment of any of the purposes or the attainment of any of the objects
herein enumerated, or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of
the association, and to contract accordingly; to exercise and possess all powers,
rights, and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the
association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged, and, in
addition, any other rights, powers, and privileges granted by the laws of this
State to corporations organized under the general laws of this State, except
such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this subchapter and to
the extent consistent with the artificial-person powers defined in subsection (e)
of this section; and to do any such thing anywhere.
(b) A cooperative association organized pursuant to this chapter has
artificial-person powers and only the powers expressly granted elsewhere in
this chapter.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 11 of 36
(c) The creation and continued existence of a cooperative association
organized pursuant to this chapter is a conditional grant of legal status by the
State and remains subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(d) Any action of a cooperative association constituting election activity or
ballot-issue activity is void and ultra vires.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to lawful cooperative association purposes, excluding any authority
to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a cooperative association to endorse a
ballot question and the de minimis use of resources of the cooperative
association to communicate the endorsement to the general public; or
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 12 of 36
(iii) activity by a cooperative association to support or oppose
consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body
of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
(3)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a cooperative association to endorse a
candidate and the de minimis use of cooperative association resources to
communicate the endorsement of the candidate to the general public, provided
that the endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate
or the candidate’s committee; or
(iii) the de minimis use of cooperative association resources to
provide administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 13 of 36
(f) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (e) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
Sec. 5. 11 V.S.A. chapter 8 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 8. WORKER COOPERATIVE CORPORATIONS
* * *
§ 1093. POWERS
(a) The creation and continued existence of a worker cooperative
corporation governed by this chapter is a conditional grant of legal status by
the State and remains subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(b) A worker cooperative corporation governed by this chapter has only
artificial-person powers and the powers otherwise applicable pursuant to Title
11A and expressly modified or supplemented by this chapter.
(c) A worker cooperative corporation governed by this chapter possesses
no power to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and any such
activity is ultra vires and void.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to lawful worker cooperative corporation purposes, excluding any
authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 14 of 36
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a worker cooperative corporation to
endorse a ballot question and the de minimis use of resources of the worker
cooperative corporation to communicate the endorsement to the general public;
or
(iii) activity by a worker cooperative corporation to support or
oppose consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative
body of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
(3)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 15 of 36
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a worker cooperative corporation to
endorse a candidate and the de minimis use of worker cooperative corporation
resources to communicate the endorsement of the candidate to the general
public, provided that the endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved
by the candidate or the candidate’s committee; or
(iii) the de minimis use of worker cooperative corporation
resources to provide administrative support for the establishment or operation
of a political committee.
(e) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (d) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
Sec. 6. 11 V.S.A. § 4011 is amended to read:
§ 4011. NATURE OF BUSINESS AND POWERS; GOVERNING LAW
* * *
(e)(1) A limited liability company shall possess and may exercise all the
powers and privileges granted by this chapter, any other law, its articles of
organization, or its operating agreement, together with any powers incidental
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 16 of 36
thereto, so far as the powers and privileges are necessary or convenient to the
conduct, promotion, or attainment of the business purposes or activities of the
limited liability company, including power to sue and to be sued, complain and
defend in its company name, and the power to do all things necessary or
convenient to carry on its activities The creation and continued existence of a
limited liability company governed by this chapter is a conditional grant of
legal status by the State and remains subject to revocation or alteration at any
time.
(2) A limited liability company has only artificial-person powers and the
powers expressly granted elsewhere in this chapter.
(3) A limited liability company governed by this chapter possesses no
power to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity, and any such
activity is ultra vires and void.
(4) A limited liability company that undertakes, finances, or directs
election activity or ballot-issue activity without authority pursuant to this
chapter shall be required to remit payment to the Office of the State Treasurer
of an amount equal to the value expended in the activity.
(5) A foreign limited liability company that directly or indirectly
undertakes, finances, or directs election activity or ballot-issue activity in this
State, or with respect to any election or ballot measure submitted to the
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 17 of 36
electors of this State, is conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this
State for jurisdiction and enforcement purposes.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into by a limited liability company on or before December 31,
2026.
* * *
(h) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to lawful limited liability company purposes, excluding any
authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 18 of 36
(ii) the determination by a limited liability company to endorse a
ballot question and the de minimis use of resources of the limited liability
company to communicate the endorsement to the general public; or
(iii) activity by a limited liability company to support or oppose
consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body
of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
(3)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a limited liability company to endorse a
candidate and the de minimis use of limited liability company resources to
communicate the endorsement of the candidate to the general public, provided
that the endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate
or the candidate’s committee; or
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 19 of 36
(iii) the de minimis use of limited liability company resources to
provide administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
(i) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (h) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
Sec. 7. 11 V.S.A. § 3208 is added to read:
§ 3208. POLITICAL ACTIVITY; LIMITATIONS
(a) A limited partnership organized under this chapter shall possess no
authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(b) Any election activity or ballot-issue activity undertaken, financed, or
directed by a limited partnership is ultra vires and void.
(c) A limited partnership that undertakes an ultra vires election activity or
ballot-issue activity shall be required to remit payment to the Office of the
State Treasurer of an amount equal to the value expended in the activity.
(d) The liability provisions set forth in subsection (b) of this section apply
to limited partnerships and to all general partners, limited partners, and other
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 20 of 36
persons of the limited partnership who authorize, direct, control, or knowingly
participate in such activity.
(e) This section applies only to limited partnerships and does not apply to
general partnerships or other associations in which all partners bear unlimited
personal liability for the obligations of the partnership.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to limited partnership purposes, excluding any authority to engage
in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a limited partnership to endorse a ballot
question and the de minimis use of resources of the limited partnership to
communicate the endorsement to the general public; or
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 21 of 36
(iii) activity by a limited partnership to support or oppose
consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body
of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
(3)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a limited partnership to endorse a
candidate and the de minimis use of limited partnership resources to
communicate the endorsement of the candidate to the general public, provided
that the endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate
or the candidate’s committee; or
(iii) the de minimis use of limited partnership resources to provide
administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 22 of 36
(g) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (f) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
Sec. 8. 11 V.S.A. § 3408 is added to read:
§ 3408. POLITICAL ACTIVITY; LIMITATIONS
(a) A limited liability partnership organized under this chapter shall possess
no authority to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(b) Any election activity or ballot-issue activity undertaken, financed, or
directed by a limited liability partnership is ultra vires and void.
(c) A limited liability partnership that undertakes an ultra vires election
activity or ballot-issue activity shall be required to remit payment to the Office
of the State Treasurer of an amount equal to the value expended in the activity.
(d) The liability provisions set forth in subsection (b) of this section apply
to limited liability partnerships and to all partners and other persons who
authorize, direct, control, or knowingly participate in such activity.
(e) This section applies only to limited liability partnerships and does not
apply to general partnerships or other associations in which all partners bear
unlimited personal liability for the obligations of the partnership.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 23 of 36
(f) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to limited liability partnership purposes, excluding any authority to
engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a limited liability partnership to endorse a
ballot question and the de minimis use of resources of the limited liability
partnership to communicate the endorsement to the general public; or
(iii) activity by a limited liability partnership to support or oppose
consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body
of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 24 of 36
(3) “Charter privileges” means the privileges conferred by the State
upon a corporation by virtue of its incorporation, including limited liability,
perpetual duration, succession in its corporate name, and the authority to
transact business as a corporation under the laws of this State.
(4)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a limited liability partnership to endorse a
candidate and the de minimis use of limited liability partnership resources to
communicate the endorsement of the candidate to the general public, provided
that the endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate
or the candidate’s committee; or
(iii) the de minimis use of limited liability partnership resources to
provide administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 25 of 36
(g) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (f) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
Sec. 9. 11A V.S.A. § 3.02 is amended to read:
§ 3.02. GENERAL POWERS
(a) All powers, privileges, and capacities granted or implied under the laws
of this State to a corporation organized under this title on or before December
31, 2026, are hereby revoked in their entirety.
(b) Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every Every
corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and
has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary and convenient
to carry out its business and affairs organized under this title is granted
artificial-person powers along with any enumerated power that is consistent
with such artificial-person powers, including without limitation the power:
* * *
(c)(1) The creation and continued existence of a corporation organized
under this title is a conditional grant of legal status by the State and remains
subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(2) Any act of a corporation organized under this title constituting
election activity or ballot-issue activity is ultra vires and void and results in
forfeiture of all charter privileges. The Secretary of State shall only reinstate
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 26 of 36
the corporation’s charter upon the corporation’s payment to the Office of the
State Treasurer of the amount equal to the unlawful expenditures along with a
certification of compliance.
(3) A foreign corporation that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances,
or directs election activity or ballot-issue activity in this State, or with respect
to any election or ballot measure submitted to the electors of this State, is
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this State for jurisdiction and
enforcement purposes
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into by a corporation organized pursuant to this title on or
before December 31, 2026.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out the lawful purposes of a corporation, excluding any
authority of the corporation to engage in election activity or ballot-issue
activity.
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 27 of 36
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a corporation to endorse a ballot question
and the de minimis use of resources of the corporation to communicate the
endorsement to the general public; or
(iii) activity by a corporation to support or oppose consideration of
a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body of a political
subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or certification of the
measure to the electors.
(3)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 28 of 36
(ii) the determination by a corporation to endorse a candidate and
the de minimis use of corporation resources to communicate the endorsement
of the candidate to the general public, provided that the endorsement is not
facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate or the candidate’s
committee; or
(iii) the de minimis use of corporation resources to provide
administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
(e) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (d) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
Sec. 10. 11B V.S.A. chapter 3 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 3. PURPOSES AND POWERS
§ 3.01. PURPOSES
(a) A corporation may be organized under this chapter for any lawful
purpose or purposes consistent with the artificial-person powers granted
pursuant to section 3.02 of this chapter, including, without being limited to,
any one or more of the following purposes: charitable; benevolent;
eleemosynary; educational; civic; patriotic; political; religious; social;
fraternal; sororal; literary; cultural; athletic; scientific; agricultural;
horticultural; animal husbandry; and professional, commercial, industrial, or
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 29 of 36
trade association. Under no circumstances shall election activity or ballot-
issue activity be deemed a lawful purpose of a corporation organized under this
chapter.
* * *
§ 3.02. GENERAL POWERS
(a) All powers, privileges, and capacities granted or implied under the laws
of this State to a corporation organized under this title on or before December
31, 2026, are hereby revoked in their entirety.
(b) Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every Every
corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and
has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient
to carry out its affairs organized under this title is granted artificial-person
powers along with any enumerated power that is consistent with such artificial-
person powers, including, without limitation, the power:
* * *
(18) to do all things necessary or convenient, not inconsistent with law,
and within the scope of artificial-person powers, to further the activities and
affairs of the corporation.
(c)(1) A corporation organized under this title that operates primarily as a
political committee or political party may engage in election activity or ballot-
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 30 of 36
issue activity only to the extent permitted by law and shall claim no charter
privilege other than limited liability for its members, directors, and officers.
(2) The creation and continued existence of a corporation organized
under this title is a conditional grant of legal status by the State and remains
subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(3) Except as provided in subdivision (1) of this section, any act of a
corporation organized under this title constituting election activity or ballot-
issue activity is ultra vires and void and results in forfeiture of all charter
privileges. The Secretary of State shall only reinstate the corporation’s charter
upon the corporation’s payment to the Office of the State Treasurer of the
amount equal to the unlawful expenditures along with a certification of
compliance.
(4) A foreign corporation that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances,
or directs election activity or ballot-issue activity in this State, or with respect
to any election or ballot measure submitted to the electors of this State, is
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this State for jurisdiction and
enforcement purposes.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into by a corporation organized pursuant to this title on or
before December 31, 2026.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 31 of 36
(d) As used in this chapter:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out the lawful purposes of a corporation, excluding any
authority of the corporation to engage in election activity or ballot-issue
activity.
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a corporation to endorse a ballot question
and the de minimis use of resources of the corporation to communicate the
endorsement to the general public; or
(iii) activity by a corporation to support or oppose consideration of
a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body of a political
subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or certification of the
measure to the electors.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 32 of 36
(3) “Charter privileges” means the privileges conferred by the State
upon a corporation by virtue of its incorporation, including limited liability,
perpetual duration, succession in its corporate name, and the authority to
transact business as a corporation under the laws of this State.
(4)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) the determination by a corporation to endorse a candidate and
the de minimis use of corporation resources to communicate the endorsement
of the candidate to the general public, provided that the endorsement is not
facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate or the candidate’s
committee; or
(ii) the de minimis use of corporation resources to provide
administrative support for the establishment or operation of a political
committee.
(e) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (d) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
* * *
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 33 of 36
Sec. 11. 11C V.S.A. § 106 is amended to read:
§ 106. POWERS
(a) All powers, privileges, and capacities granted or implied under the laws
of this State to a mutual benefit enterprise organized under this title on or
before December 31, 2026, are hereby revoked in their entirety.
(b) A mutual benefit enterprise may sue and be sued in its own name and
do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities is granted only
artificial-person powers. An enterprise may maintain an action against a
member for harm caused to the enterprise by the member’s violation of a duty
to the enterprise or of the organic laws or organic rules.
(c)(1) The creation and continued existence of an enterprise organized
under this title is a conditional grant of legal status by the State and remains
subject to revocation or alteration at any time.
(2) Any act of an enterprise organized under this title constituting
election activity or ballot-issue activity is ultra vires and void.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate, impair, or
modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into by an enterprise organized pursuant to this title on or
before December 31, 2026.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 34 of 36
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Artificial-person powers” means the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out the lawful purposes of an enterprise, excluding any
authority of the enterprise to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
(2)(A) “Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose any initiative, referendum,
recall, constitutional amendment, charter amendment, or any other question
formally certified or submitted to the electors of the State or any of its political
subdivisions.
(B) “Ballot-issue activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a mutual benefit enterprise to endorse a
ballot question and the de minimis use of resources of the mutual benefit
enterprise to communicate the endorsement to the general public; or
(iii) activity by a mutual benefit enterprise to support or oppose
consideration of a measure by the General Assembly or by a legislative body
of a political subdivision of the State prior to the formal submission or
certification of the measure to the electors.
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 35 of 36
(3)(A) “Election activity” means paying, contributing, or expending
money or anything of value to support or oppose a candidate, political party, or
political committee.
(B) “Election activity” does not include:
(i) any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial distributed
through an independent news organization not owned or controlled by a
political party, political committee, or candidate;
(ii) the determination by a mutual benefit enterprise to endorse a
candidate and the de minimis use of mutual benefit enterprise resources to
communicate the endorsement of the candidate to the general public, provided
that the endorsement is not facilitated, solicited, or approved by the candidate
or the candidate’s committee; or
(iii) the de minimis use of mutual benefit enterprise resources to
provide administrative support.
(e) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to adopt rules regarding
the definitions of terms set forth in subsection (d) of this section, including
setting parameters on what is and is not considered “de minimis.”
VT LEG #385613 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.322
2026 Page 36 of 36
Sec. 12. APPLICABILITY OF CORPORATE POWER RESET
(a) Nothing in this act shall invalidate, impair, or modify any contract, debt
instrument, security, or other legal obligation lawfully entered into on or before
December 31, 2026.
(b) No power, privilege, or capacity withheld or limited by this act shall be
revived, reinstated, or implied by operation of law or judicial construction.
(c) If any provision of this act is held invalid as applied to any artificial
legal person, the invalidity shall not be construed to authorize that entity to
engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity or to revive any power,
privilege, or capacity withheld by this act.
Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385613 v.4